Arkansas, session 2025, SB628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-13-506 is amended to read as follows:
16-13-506. Court reporters — Transcript fees.
(a)(1) When required to make a transcript of court proceedings, each
court reporter of the circuit courts shall be entitled to compensation at the
rate of four dollars and ten cents ($4.10) eight dollars ($8.00) per page for
the original and two (2) copies and at the rate of fifty cents (50¢) one
dollar ($1.00) per page for each additional copy.
(2) When required to prepare photocopied evidence as part of a
transcript, each court reporter shall be entitled to compensation at the rate
of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per
page for an original and two (2) copies and at the rate of fifty cents (50¢)
one dollar ($1.00) per page for each additional copy thereafter, with the
cost to be paid by the parties ordering transcripts.
(3) The circuit court judge in which the court proceeding
occurred is exempt from this section The official court reporter for a
*CEB118*
04/04/2025 10:00:40 AM CEB118

SB628
circuit judge who maintains a criminal docket is entitled to one hundred
fifty percent (150%) of the compensation provided in subdivisions (a)(1) and
(a)(2) of this section when producing a record of criminal proceedings for
the circuit judge.
(4)(A) If the circuit court judge utilized a substitute official
court reporter under § 16-13-509 for a court proceeding that the circuit
court judge later determines requires a transcript, the substitute official
court reporter shall receive additional compensation for producing the
transcript for the circuit court judge.
(B) The Trial Employees Committee of the Arkansas Judicial
Council, Inc., shall develop a policy that shall be implemented by the
Administrative Office of the Courts to ensure fair compensation for a
substitute official court reporter who is required to produce a transcript
for a circuit court judge.
(b)(1)(A) In indigent and in forma pauperis proceedings, the
compensation to the court reporter for transcripts provided for in subsection
(a) of this section shall be paid by the State of Arkansas.
(B) However, in In such proceedings, the court reporters
shall be entitled to compensation from the state only for the original and
two (2) copies of the transcript.
(C) If additional persons request copies of the
transcript, the court reporter shall be entitled to payment from the persons
requesting the copies at the rate specified in subsection (a) of this
section.
(2) The payments from the state shall be made only upon
certification of the payments by the presiding circuit judge and shall be
paid by the Administrative Office of the Courts from funds appropriated out
of the Court Reporter's Fund.
(c) When the state is required to pay the court reporter for the cost
of the preparation of a transcript, § 16-13-510 applies and the state shall
comply with a court reporter's request for the payment of a deposit under §
16-13-510(c)(1).




04/04/2025 10:00:40 AM CEB118